Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.260

Enforcement—Rules—Scope. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

The director shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and may adopt any rule necessary to carry out its purpose and provisions including but not limited to the following:

(1) The director may adopt rules establishing standards for grades and/or classifications for any horticultural plant.

(2) The director shall adopt rules for labeling or tagging horticultural plants.

(3) The director may adopt rules for the inspection and/or certification of any horticultural plant as to variety, quality, size and freedom from infestation by plant pests.

(4) The director may adopt rules for the inspection and/or certification of any Christmas tree as to freedom from infestation by plant pests.

(5) The director shall adopt rules establishing fees for nursery dealer licenses and for inspection of horticultural plants and methods of fee collection.

(6) The director may adopt rules prescribing minimum informational requirements for advertising for the sale of horticultural plants within the state.

(7) The director may adopt rules establishing categories of sales and fees for permits established in RCW 15.13.270.

(8) The director may adopt rules establishing fees for Christmas tree grower licenses and for inspection of Christmas trees and methods of fee collection.

[ 2007 c 335 s 2; 2000 c 144 s 2; 1993 c 120 s 2; 1990 c 261 s 2; 1985 c 36 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 2.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.260

Enforcement—Rules—Scope. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

The director shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and may adopt any rule necessary to carry out its purpose and provisions including but not limited to the following:

(1) The director may adopt rules establishing standards for grades and/or classifications for any horticultural plant.

(2) The director shall adopt rules for labeling or tagging horticultural plants.

(3) The director may adopt rules for the inspection and/or certification of any horticultural plant as to variety, quality, size and freedom from infestation by plant pests.

(4) The director shall adopt rules establishing fees for nursery dealer licenses and for inspection of horticultural plants and methods of fee collection.

(5) The director may adopt rules prescribing minimum informational requirements for advertising for the sale of horticultural plants within the state.

(6) The director may adopt rules establishing categories of sales and fees for permits established in RCW 15.13.270.

[ 2000 c 144 s 2; 1993 c 120 s 2; 1990 c 261 s 2; 1985 c 36 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 2.]